Vermont, session 2025-2026, H177.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Education Income Tax * * *
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. chapter 151, subchapter 14 is added to read:
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 2 of 50
Subchapter 14. Education Income Tax
§ 5961. NAME OF TAX
The tax imposed by this subchapter shall be known as the Vermont
education income tax.
§ 5962. EDUCATION INCOME TAX ON INDIVIDUALS
(a) In addition to the personal income tax assessed under section 5822 of
this title, there shall be an education income tax imposed each taxable year
upon the adjusted gross income earned or received in that year by every
individual subject to income taxation under the laws of the United States, in an
amount determined by the following tables and adjusted as required under this
section and section 5963 of this subchapter.
(1) Married individuals filing joint returns and surviving spouses:
If adjusted gross income is: The tax is:
Not over $64,600.00 3.35% of adjusted
gross income
Over $64,600.00 but $2,164.00 plus 6.60% of
not over $156,150.00 the amount of adjusted
gross income over $64,600.00
Over $156,150.00 but $8,206.00 plus 7.60%
not over $237,950.00 of the amount of adjusted
gross income over $156,150.00
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 3 of 50
Over $237,950.00 $14,423.00 plus 8.75%
of the amount of adjusted
gross income over $237,950.00
(2) Heads of household:
If adjusted gross income is: The tax is:
Not over $51,850.00 3.35% of adjusted
gross income
Over $51,850.00 but $1,737.00 plus 6.60% of
not over $133,850.00 the amount of adjusted
gross income over $51,850.00
Over $133,850.00 but $7,149.00 plus 7.60%
not over $216,700.00 of the amount of adjusted
gross income over $133,850.00
Over $216,700.00 $13,446.00 plus 8.75%
of the amount of adjusted
gross income over $216,700.00
(3) Unmarried individuals, other than surviving spouses or heads of
household:
If adjusted gross income is: The tax is:
Not over $38,700.00 3.35% of adjusted
gross income
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 4 of 50
Over $38,700.00 but $1,296.00 plus 6.60% of
not over $93,700.00 the amount of adjusted
gross income over $38,700.00
Over $93,700.00 but $4,926.00 plus 7.60%
not over $195,450.00 of the amount of adjusted
gross income over $93,700.00
Over $195,450.00 $12,659.00 plus 8.75%
of the amount of adjusted
gross income over $195,450.00
(4) Married individuals filing separate returns:
If adjusted gross income is: The tax is:
Not over $32,300.00 3.35% of adjusted
gross income
Over $32,300.00 but $1,082.00 plus 6.60% of
not over $78,075.00 the amount of adjusted
gross income over $32,300.00
Over $78,075.00 but $4,103.00 plus 7.60%
not over $118,975.00 of the amount of adjusted
gross income over $78,075.00
Over $118,975.00 $7,212.00 plus 8.75%
of the amount of adjusted
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 5 of 50
gross income over $118,975.00
(b) The amounts of adjusted gross income shown in the tables in this
section shall be adjusted annually for inflation by the Commissioner of Taxes
pursuant to subdivision 5822(b)(2) of this chapter.
(c)(1) The rates shown in the tables in this section shall be adjusted for
each school district by dividing the school district’s per pupil education
spending, as defined in 16 V.S.A. § 4001(6), by the prior year’s statewide
average per pupil education spending and multiplying the result by the rates
under this section.
(2) The final rate for each school district determined under this
subsection shall apply to the Vermont income, as defined in section 5963 of
this title, of a resident or part-year resident for the entire taxable year. As used
in this subdivision, the “final rate” for each school district means the average
of the district’s rates in effect between January 1 and December 31.
(3) A resident or part-year resident individual shall pay the rate adjusted
under this subsection for the individual’s school district of residence on
January 1 of the taxable year or, in the case of a part-year resident individual
whose residence begins on a day other than January 1, the school district where
the individual resides on the first day of residence in this State. The rate
adjustments under this subsection shall not apply to a nonresident individual.
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 6 of 50
(d) The tax liability determined under subsections (a) through (c) of this
section shall be reduced by a percentage equal to the portion of adjusted gross
income that is not Vermont income; provided, however, that if a taxpayer’s
Vermont income exceeds the taxpayer’s adjusted gross income, no reduction
shall be made and provided further that if a taxpayer has zero or negative
Vermont income and the taxpayer’s Vermont income computed without regard
to the reductions in section 5963 of this subchapter does not equal or exceed
the taxpayer’s adjusted gross income, no tax shall be due under this section.
(e) The education income tax under this subchapter shall be assessed and
administered in the same manner as the personal income tax under this chapter.
(f) As used in this section, “married individuals,” “surviving spouse,”
“head of household,” and “unmarried individual” have the same meaning as
under the Internal Revenue Code.
§ 5963. VERMONT INCOME OF INDIVIDUALS
(a) As used in this subchapter, for any taxable year, the Vermont income of
a resident individual is the adjusted gross income of the individual for that
taxable year, less income exempted from State taxation under the laws of the
United States.
(b)(1) As used in this subchapter, for any taxable year, the Vermont income
of a nonresident individual is the sum of the following items of income to the
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 7 of 50
extent they are required to be included in the adjusted gross income of the
individual:
(A) rents and royalties derived from the ownership of property
located within this State;
(B) gains from the sale or exchange of property located within this
State;
(C) wages, salaries, commissions, or other income received with
respect to services performed within this State;
(D) income, other than income exempted from State taxation under
the laws of the United States, derived from every business, trade, occupation,
or profession to the extent that the business, trade, occupation, or profession is
carried on within this State, including any compensation received:
(i) under an agreement not to compete with a business operating in
Vermont;
(ii) for goodwill associated with the sale of a Vermont business; or
(iii) for services to be performed under a contract associated with
the sale of a Vermont business, unless it is shown that the compensation for
services does not constitute income from the sale of the business;
(E) income that was previously deferred under a nonqualified
deferred compensation plan and that would have previously been included in
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 8 of 50
the taxpayer’s Vermont income if it had not been deferred and income derived
from such previously deferred income; and
(F) proceeds from wagering transactions made within the State; or
any Vermont State Lottery, tri-state lottery, or multijurisdictional lottery ticket
paid to a person who purchased the ticket in Vermont, including payments
received from a third party for the transfer of the rights to future proceeds
related to the ticket; and the Commissioner may require withholding of any
taxes due to the State under this subdivision (b)(1) from payments of wagering
or lottery proceeds.
(2) As used in this subchapter, for any taxable year, the Vermont income
of a nonresident individual shall not include any income from the activities
listed in this subdivision or the income of a nonresident through an entity, such
as a partnership, limited liability company, or trust, provided that the entity’s
activities in this State are limited to activities that, without more, would not
constitute nexus, plus any or all of the following activities necessary to create
or maintain a web page or internet site for the nonresident or entity:
(A) ownership of data or programming code in this State, or use of
that data or programming code by a person other than the nonresident or entity
or by a person not in this State;
(B) ownership of, or receipt of services from, computer servers in
this State; and
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 9 of 50
(C) receipt of computer processing or web hosting services from a
computer service provider or web hosting service in this State.
(c) As used in this subchapter, for any taxable year, the Vermont income of
a part-year resident individual or trust is the sum of:
(1) all items of income constituting Vermont income for the purpose of
subsection (a) of this section that are earned or received during the period of
the taxpayer’s residency in this State in the taxable year; and
(2) all items of income constituting Vermont income for the purposes of
subdivision (b)(1) of this section that are earned or received during the period
of the taxpayer’s nonresidency in this State in the taxable year.
§ 5964. EDUCATION INCOME TAX; RENTER CREDIT
(a) A resident individual or part-year resident individual shall be entitled to
a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed by section 5962 of this title for
the taxable year. The total credit per taxable year shall be 21 percent of gross
rent paid by the renter during the taxable year, multiplied by the percentage
that the individual’s income that is earned or received during the period of the
individual’s residency in this State bears to the individual’s total income.
(b) As used in this section, “gross rent” means the rent and related charges
paid by the individual for the right to occupy the individual’s primary dwelling
as the individual’s domicile in this State during the taxable year.
* * * Withholding, Estimated Payments, and Returns * * *
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 10 of 50
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5841 is amended to read:
§ 5841. REQUIREMENT AND RATE OF WITHHOLDING
(a) Every person who is required under the laws of the United States to
withhold federal income tax from payments that are also subject to Vermont
income tax or education income tax shall deduct and withhold during the
calendar year from the payments made by such person such the amount of tax
as the Commissioner shall prescribe. Every person who makes payments of
income with respect to services performed for such person that were previously
deferred under a nonqualified deferred compensation plan shall deduct and
withhold during the calendar year from the payments made by such person six
percent of any payment (including any withheld tax) of such previously
deferred income and of income derived from such previously deferred income.
The Commissioner may authorize any person to deduct and withhold Vermont
income tax and education income tax from any other payments that are subject
to the tax taxes imposed by this chapter. Notwithstanding the foregoing, banks
(as defined in 8 V.S.A. § 909a(a)) shall not be required to withhold Vermont
income tax or education income tax from payments that are subject to federal
back-up withholding.
(b) The Commissioner shall establish such withholding tables, schedules,
or formulae as will result in the withholding of such amounts from the
payments made by any person during any taxable year, as shall closely
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 11 of 50
approximate the income tax liabilities of the recipients of those payments with
respect to those payments for that year under this chapter, including any
liability for the education income tax under section 5962 of this title.
* * *
(d) The Commissioner shall base the withholding requirements for the
education income tax under section 5962 of this title on the federal adjusted
gross income of recipients from the prior year and the statewide average rates
from the prior year, provided the rate shall be adjusted annually for inflation
using the National Income and Product Accounts (NIPA) Implicit Price
Deflator for State and Local Government Consumption Expenditures and
Gross Investment as reported by the U.S. Department of Commerce, Bureau of
Economic Analysis.
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 5851(1) is amended to read:
(1) “Tax” means, for any taxpayer and for any taxable year, the income
tax liability of the taxpayer for that taxable year under section 5822 or 5962 of
this title, reduced by any allowable credits against such tax.
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 5852(a) is amended to read:
(a) Every individual, estate, and trust subject to taxation under section 5822
of this title (other than a person receiving at least two-thirds of his or her the
person’s income from farming or fishing as defined under the laws of the
United States) or section 5962 of this title shall make installment payments of
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 12 of 50
the taxpayer’s estimated tax liability for each taxable year. The amount of
each payment shall be 25 percent of the required annual payment. For any
taxable year, payments shall be made on or before April 15, June 15, and
September 15 of the taxable year and January 15 of the following taxable year.
In applying this section to a taxable year beginning on any date other than
January 1, there shall be substituted, for the months specified in this section,
the months that correspond thereto.
Sec. 5. 32 V.S.A. § 5861 is amended to read:
§ 5861. RETURNS BY INDIVIDUALS, TRUSTS, AND ESTATES
(a) Every individual, trust, or estate subject to taxation for any taxable year
under section 5822 or 5962 of this title shall file a Vermont personal income
tax return for that taxable year if that person is required to file a United States
income tax return for that year and:
(1) earned or received more than $100.00 of Vermont income, or;
(2) earned or received more than $1,000.00 in gross income from the
sources listed in subdivisions 5823(b)(1) through (6) or subsections 5962(b)
and (c) of this title, whether or not a resident, in that year,; or
(3) has a tax liability under this chapter for that year.
* * *
(e) The Commissioner may shall require information on a Vermont
personal income tax return that is sufficient to identify the school district, as
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 13 of 50
defined in 16 V.S.A. § 11(a)(10), in which the taxpayer resides and whether
the taxpayer’s residence is a rental dwelling in this State. The Commissioner
may consider a return incomplete if the information required under this
subsection is not provided and shall cause the return to be completed.
* * *
Sec. 6. 32 V.S.A. § 5820 is amended to read:
§ 5820. PURPOSE
(a) This chapter is intended to conform the Vermont personal and,
corporate, and education income taxes with the U.S. Internal Revenue Code,
except as otherwise expressly provided, in order to simplify the taxpayer’s
filing of returns, reduce the taxpayer’s accounting burdens, and facilitate the
collection and administration of these taxes.
(b) It is intended that, for any taxable year, individuals, estates, and trusts
shall be taxed upon only their Vermont income for that year, but that the rate at
which the Vermont income of any taxpayer is taxed under this chapter shall
reflect the taxpayer’s ability to pay as measured by his or her the taxpayer’s
adjusted gross income for the taxable year.
* * * Nonhomestead Education Property Tax * * *
Sec. 7. 32 V.S.A. § 5401 is amended to read:
§ 5401. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 14 of 50
* * *
(7) “Homestead”:
(A) “Homestead” means the principal dwelling and parcel two acres
of land surrounding the dwelling, owned and occupied by a resident individual
as the individual’s domicile or owned and fully leased on April 1, provided the
property is not leased for more than 182 days out of the calendar year or, for
purposes of the renter credit under subsection 6066(b) of this title, is rented
and occupied by a resident individual as the individual’s domicile.
* * *
(G) For purposes of homestead declaration and application of the
homestead property tax rate, “homestead” “Homestead” also means a
residence that was the homestead of the decedent at the date of death and, from
the date of death through the next April 1, is held by the estate of the decedent
and not rented.
* * *
(10) “Nonhomestead property” means all property except:
* * *
(C) Homesteads declared in accordance with section 5410 of this title
as defined in subdivision (7) of this section.
* * *
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 15 of 50
(13)(A) “Education property tax spending adjustment” means the
greater of one or a fraction in which:
(i) the numerator is the district’s per pupil education spending plus
excess spending for the school year, and
(ii) the denominator is the property dollar equivalent yield for the
school year, as defined in subdivision (15) of this section, multiplied by the
statewide adjustment.
(B) “Education income tax spending adjustment” means the greater
of one or a fraction in which the numerator is the district’s per pupil education
spending plus excess spending for the school year, and the denominator is the
income dollar equivalent yield for the school year, as defined in subdivision
(16) of this section. [Repealed.]
* * *
(15) “Property dollar equivalent yield” means the amount of per pupil
education spending that would result in a district having a homestead tax rate
of $1.00 per $100.00 of equalized education property value. [Repealed.]
(16) “Income dollar equivalent yield” means the amount of per pupil
education spending that would result in a district having an income percentage
in subdivision 6066(a)(2) of this title of 2.0 percent. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 8. 32 V.S.A. § 5402 is amended to read:
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 16 of 50
§ 5402. NONHOMESTEAD EDUCATION PROPERTY TAX LIABILITY
(a) A statewide education tax is imposed on all nonhomestead and
homestead property at the following rates:
(1) The tax rate for nonhomestead property shall be rate of $1.59 per
$100.00 divided by the statewide adjustment.
(2) The tax rate for homestead property shall be $1.00 multiplied by the
education property tax spending adjustment for the municipality per $100.00 of
equalized education property value as most recently determined under section
5405 of this title. The homestead property tax rate for each municipality that is
a member of a union or unified union school district shall be calculated as
required under subsection (e) of this section.
(b) The statewide nonhomestead education tax shall be calculated as
follows:
(1) The Commissioner of Taxes shall determine for each municipality
the nonhomestead education tax rates rate under subsection (a) of this section
divided by the number resulting from dividing the municipality’s most recent
common level of appraisal by the statewide adjustment. The legislative body
in each municipality shall then bill each property taxpayer at the homestead or
nonhomestead rate determined by the Commissioner under this subdivision,
multiplied by the nonhomestead education property tax grand list value of the
property, properly classified as homestead or nonhomestead property and
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 17 of 50
without regard to any other tax classification of the property. Statewide
nonhomestead education property tax bills shall show the tax due and the
calculation of the rate determined under subsection (a) of this section, divided
by the number resulting from dividing the municipality’s most recent common
level of appraisal by the statewide adjustment, multiplied by the current grand
list value of the property to be taxed. Statewide nonhomestead education
property tax bills shall also include language provided by the Commissioner
pursuant to subsection 5405(g) of this title.
(2) Taxes assessed under this section shall be assessed and collected in
the same manner as taxes assessed under chapter 133 of this title with no tax
classification other than as homestead or nonhomestead property; provided,
however, that the tax levied under this chapter shall be billed to each taxpayer
by the municipality in a manner that clearly indicates the tax is separate from
any other tax assessed and collected under chapter 133, including an
itemization of the separate taxes due. The bill may be on a single sheet of
paper with the statewide education tax and other taxes presented separately and
side by side.
(3) If a district has not voted a budget by June 30, an interim homestead
education tax shall be imposed at the base rate determined under subdivision
(a)(2) of this section, divided by the number resulting from dividing the
municipality’s most recent common level of appraisal by the statewide
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 18 of 50
adjustment, but without regard to any spending adjustment under subdivision
5401(13) of this title. Within 30 days after a budget is adopted and the deadline
for reconsideration has passed, the Commissioner shall determine the
municipality’s homestead tax rate as required under subdivision (1) of this
subsection. [Repealed.]
(c)(1) The treasurer of each municipality shall by December 1 of the year in
which the tax is levied and on June 1 of the following year pay to the State
Treasurer for deposit in the Education Fund one-half of the municipality’s
statewide nonhomestead tax and one-half of the municipality’s homestead
education tax, as determined under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(2) The Secretary of Education shall determine each municipality’s net
nonhomestead education tax payment and its net homestead education tax
payment to the State based on grand list information received by the Secretary
not later than the March 15 prior to the June 1 net payment. Payment shall be
accompanied by a return prescribed by the Secretary of Education. Each
municipality may retain 0.225 of one percent of the total education tax
collected, only upon timely remittance of net payment to the State Treasurer or
to the applicable school district or districts. Each municipality may also retain
$15.00 for each late property tax credit claim filed after April 15 and before
September 2, as notified by the Department of Taxes, for the cost of issuing a
new property tax bill.
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 19 of 50
(d) [Repealed.]
(e) The Commissioner of Taxes shall determine a homestead education tax
rate for each municipality that is a member of a union or unified union school
district as follows:
(1) For a municipality that is a member of a unified union school
district, use the base rate determined under subdivision (a)(2) of this section
and a spending adjustment under subdivision 5401(13) of this title based upon
the per pupil education spending of the unified union.
(2) For a municipality that is a member of a union school district:
(A) Determine the municipal district homestead tax rate using the
base rate determined under subdivision (a)(2) of this section and a spending
adjustment under subdivision 5401(13) of this title based on the per pupil
education spending in the municipality who attends a school other than the
union school.
(B) Determine the union district homestead tax rate using the base
rate determined under subdivision (a)(2) of this section and a spending
adjustment under subdivision 5401(13) of this title based on the per pupil
education spending of the union school district.
(C) Determine a combined homestead tax rate by calculating the
weighted average of the rates determined under subdivisions (A) and (B) of
this subdivision (2), with weighting based upon the ratio of union school long-
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 20 of 50
term membership, as defined in 16 V.S.A. § 4001(7), from the member
municipality to total long-term membership of the member municipality; and
the ratio of long-term membership attending a school other than the union
school to total long-term membership of the member municipality. Total long-
term membership of the member municipality is based on the number of pupils
who are legal residents of the municipality and attending school at public
expense. If necessary, the Commissioner may adopt a rule to clarify and
facilitate implementation of this subsection (e). [Repealed.]
Sec. 9. 32 V.S.A. § 5402b is amended to read:
§ 5402b. STATEWIDE EDUCATION TAX YIELDS RATES;
RECOMMENDATION OF THE COMMISSIONER
(a) Annually, not later than December 1, the Commissioner of Taxes, after
consultation with the Secretary of Education, the Secretary of Administration,
and the Joint Fiscal Office, shall calculate and recommend a property dollar
equivalent yield, an income dollar equivalent yield, the education income tax
rates and a nonhomestead property tax rate for the following fiscal year. In
making these calculations, the Commissioner shall assume:
(1) the homestead base tax rate in subdivision 5402(a)(2) of this title is
$1.00 per $100.00 of equalized education property value;
(2) the applicable percentage in subdivision 6066(a)(2) of this title is
2.0;
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 21 of 50
(3) the statutory reserves under 16 V.S.A. § 4026 and this section were
maintained at five percent;
(4)(2) the percentage change in the average education tax bill applied to
nonhomestead property and the percentage change in the average education
income tax bill of homestead property and the percentage change in the
average education tax bill for taxpayers who claim a credit under subsection
6066(a) of this title are equal; and
(5) the equalized education grand list is multiplied by the statewide
adjustment in calculating the property dollar equivalent yield; and
(6)(3) the nonhomestead rate is divided by the statewide adjustment.
(b) For each fiscal year, the property dollar equivalent yield and the income
dollar equivalent yield shall be the same as in the prior fiscal year, unless set
otherwise by the General Assembly. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 10. 32 V.S.A. § 5404 is amended to read:
§ 5404. DETERMINATION OF EDUCATION PROPERTY TAX GRAND
LIST
(a)(1) Municipalities shall determine the education property tax grand list
by calculating one percent of the listed value of nonhomestead and homestead
real property as provided in this section. The listed value of all nonhomestead
and homestead real property in a municipality shall be its fair market value, its
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 22 of 50
value established under a stabilization agreement described in section 5404a of
this title, or the use value of property enrolled in a Use Value Program under
chapter 124 of this title.
(2) If a homestead is located on a parcel of greater than two acres, the
entire parcel shall be appraised at fair market value;, the housesite homestead
shall then be appraised as if it were situated on a separate parcel, and the value
of the housesite homestead shall be subtracted from the value of the total
parcel to determine the value of the remainder of the parcel, which shall be
subject to the nonhomestead tax imposed under this chapter. Pursuant to
subdivision 4152(a)(9) of this title, a homestead shall be appraised and listed at
what the full fair market value of the property would be absent the exemption
from nonhomestead tax.
* * *
Sec. 11. 32 V.S.A. § 5405 is amended to read:
§ 5405. DETERMINATION OF EQUALIZED EDUCATION PROPERTY
TAX GRAND LIST AND COEFFICIENT OF DISPERSION
* * *
(c) In determining the fair market value of property that is required to be
listed at fair market value, the Commissioner shall take into consideration
those factors required by section 3481 of this title. The Commissioner shall
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 23 of 50
value property as of April 1 preceding the determination and shall take account
of all homestead declaration information available before October 1 each year.
* * *
(g) The Commissioner shall provide to municipalities for the front of
property tax bills the district homestead property tax rate before equalization,
the nonresidential nonhomestead tax rate before equalization, and the
calculation process that creates the equalized homestead and nonhomestead tax
rates rate. The Commissioner shall further provide to municipalities for the
back of property tax bills an explanation of the common level of appraisal,
including its origin and purpose.
Sec. 12. 32 V.S.A. § 5406(c) is amended to read:
(c) If the Director of Property Valuation and Review certifies that a
municipality has completed a townwide reappraisal, the common level of
appraisal for that municipality shall be equal to its new grand list value divided
by its most recent equalized grand list value, for purposes of determining the
nonhomestead education property tax rates rate.
Sec. 13. 32 V.S.A. § 5409 is amended to read:
§ 5409. DUTIES OF MUNICIPALITIES AND ADMINISTRATION
The following shall apply with regard to the statewide nonhomestead
education property tax imposed under this chapter:
* * *
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 24 of 50
(2) If by August 1 a municipality has failed to issue notices of
assessment of the statewide nonhomestead education property tax, or if the
municipality fails for more than 90 days after the due date for any installment
payment to enforce the tax in the municipality, then the Commissioner of
Taxes shall either issue notices of assessment or collect the tax, or both, or
bring appropriate court action to require the municipal officials to issue notices
and collect the tax, as the Commissioner deems necessary.
(3) In any case of administration under subdivision (2) of this section by
the Commissioner of Taxes of education property tax:
* * *
(C) The Commissioner may abate in whole or in part the statewide
nonhomestead education taxes property tax of a taxpayer who has been granted
an abatement of municipal taxes under 24 V.S.A. § 1535.
(4) [Repealed.]
(5) In case of insufficient property tax payment by a taxpayer to a
municipality, payments shall be allocated first to municipal property tax and
next to statewide nonhomestead education property tax. In case of insufficient
payment by a taxpayer to the Department of Taxes, payments shall be allocated
first to liabilities other than the nonhomestead education taxes property tax and
next to the nonhomestead education property tax.
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 25 of 50
(6) In case of overpayment by a taxpayer who has an income tax
liability under chapter 151 of this title and a homestead property tax liability, a
refund of the overpayment, after accounting for any benefit amount allowed
under chapter 154 of this title, shall be deemed to be a refund of income tax for
purposes of debt setoff under chapter 151, subchapter 12 of this title.
[Repealed.]
(7) Notwithstanding section 435 of this title, the Commissioner shall
deposit the revenue from taxes the nonhomestead education property tax
imposed under this chapter in the education fund Education Fund.
(8) A municipality’s liability to the State for education taxes the
nonhomestead property tax shall not be reduced by any early payment property
tax discount or similar discount offered by the municipality.
* * * Repeals * * *
Sec. 14. REPEALS; HOMESTEAD PROPERTY TAX AND CREDIT
The following are repealed:
(1) 32 V.S.A. § 3108(b)(4) (interest on overpayments to homestead tax
liabilities);
(2) 32 V.S.A. § 3800(g) (statutory purpose for veterans’ homestead
property exemptions);
(3) 32 V.S.A. § 3802(11) (veterans’ homestead property exemptions);
and
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 26 of 50
(4) 32 V.S.A. § 5410 (property tax credit; homestead declaration).
Sec. 15. 32 V.S.A. § 4111(e) is amended to read:
(e) When the listers return the grand list book to the town clerk, they shall
notify by first-class mail, on which postage has been prepaid and that has been
addressed to their last known address, all affected persons listed as property
owners in the grand list book of any change in the appraised value of such
property or any change in the allocation of value to the homestead as defined
under subdivision 5401(7) of this title or the housesite as defined under
subdivision 6061(11) of this title, and also notify them of the amount of such
change and of the time and place fixed in the public notice hereinafter provided
for, when persons aggrieved may be heard. No notice shall be required for a
change solely to reflect a new use value set by the Current Use Advisory Board
or the adjustment of that value by the common level of appraisal. Notices shall
be mailed at least 14 days before the time fixed for hearing. Such personal
notices shall be given in all towns and cities within the State, anything in the
charter of any city to the contrary notwithstanding. At the same time, the
listers shall post notices in the town clerk’s office and in at least four other
public places in the town or, in the case of a city, in such other manner and
places as the city charter shall provide, setting forth that they have completed
and filed such book as an abstract and the time and place of the meeting for
hearing grievances and making corrections. Unless the personal notices
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 27 of 50
required hereby were sent by registered or certified mail, or unless an official
certificate of mailing of the same was obtained from the post office, in the case
of any controversy subsequently arising, it shall be presumed that the personal
notices were not mailed as required.
Sec. 16. 32 V.S.A § 4152(a) is amended to read:
(a) When completed, the grand list of a town shall be in such form as the
Director prescribes and shall contain such information as the Director
prescribes, including:
* * *
(9) Separate columns A separate column that will show what the listed
valuations full fair market value of homesteads, as defined in subdivision
5401(7) of this title, and housesites as defined under subdivision 6061(11) of
this title would be absent the exemption from nonhomestead property tax.
Sec. 17. 32 V.S.A. § 4261 is amended to read:
§ 4261. CORRECTING OMISSION FROM GRAND LIST
When real or personal estate is omitted from the grand list by mistake or an
obvious error is found, the listers, with the approval of the selectboard, on or
before December 31, may supply such omissions or correct such errors and
make a certificate thereon of the fact; provided, however, the listers may make
a correction resulting from the filing or rescission of a homestead declaration
without approval of the selectboard.
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 28 of 50
Sec. 18. 32 V.S.A. § 5400(c) is amended to read:
(c) The statutory purpose of the exemption for qualified housing in
subdivision 5404a(a)(6) of this title is to ensure that taxes on this rent-
restricted housing provided to Vermonters of low and moderate income are
more equivalent to property taxed using the State homestead rate and to adjust
the costs of investment in rent-restricted housing to reflect more accurately the
revenue potential of such property.
* * * Municipal Property Tax Credit * * *
Sec. 19. 32 V.S.A. chapter 154 is redesignated to read:
CHAPTER 154. HOMESTEAD MUNICIPAL PROPERTY TAX CREDIT
AND RENTER CREDIT
Sec. 20. 32 V.S.A. § 6061 is amended to read:
§ 6061. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Property Municipal property tax credit” means a credit of the prior
tax year’s statewide or municipal property tax liability or a homestead owner
credit, as authorized under section 6066 of this title, as the context requires.
* * *
(6) “Property Municipal property tax” means the amount of ad valorem
taxes, exclusive of special assessments, interest, penalties, and charges for
service, assessed by a municipality on real property in this State used as the
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 29 of 50
claimant’s housesite, or that would have been assessed if the homestead had
been properly declared at the time of assessment.
* * *
(11) “Housesite” means that portion of a homestead, as defined under
subdivision 5401(7) of this title but not under subdivision 5401(7)(G) of this
title, that includes as much of the land owned by the claimant surrounding the
dwelling as is reasonably necessary for use of the dwelling as a home, but in
no event more than two acres per dwelling unit, and, in the case of multiple
dwelling units, not more than two acres per dwelling unit up to a maximum of
10 acres per parcel. [Repealed.]
* * *
(13) “Homestead” means a homestead as defined under subdivision
5401(7) of this title, but not under subdivision 5401(7)(G) of this title, and
declared on or before October 15 in accordance with section 5410 6065 of this
title.
(14) “Statewide education tax rate” means the homestead education
property tax rate multiplied by the municipality’s education spending
adjustment under subdivision 5402(a)(2) of this title and used to calculate taxes
assessed in the municipal fiscal year that began in the taxable year.
[Repealed.]
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 30 of 50
(15) “Adjusted property tax” means the amount of education and
municipal property taxes on the homestead parcel after reduction for any
municipal property tax credit under section 6066a of this chapter.
(16) “Unadjusted property tax” means the amount of education and
municipal property taxes on the homestead parcel before any reduction for a
municipal property tax credit under section 6066a of this chapter.
(17) “Equalized value of the housesite in the taxable year” means the
value of the housesite on the grand list for April 1 of the taxable year, divided
by the municipality’s common level of appraisal determined by equalization of
the grand list for April 1 of the year preceding the taxable year. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 21. 32 V.S.A. § 6062 is amended to read:
§ 6062. NUMBER AND IDENTITY OF CLAIMANTS; APPORTIONMENT
* * *
(b) Only one municipal property tax credit claimant per household per year
shall be entitled to relief under this chapter.
(c) When a homestead is owned by two or more persons as joint tenants,
tenants by the entirety, or tenants in common and one or more of these persons
are not members of the claimant’s household, the municipal property tax is the
same proportion of the property tax levied on that homestead as the proportion
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 31 of 50
of ownership of the homestead by the claimant and members of the claimant’s
household; provided, however, that:
(1) the municipal property tax of a claimant who is 62 years of age or
older is the same proportion of the municipal property tax levied on that
homestead as the proportion of ownership of the homestead by the claimant,
members of the claimant’s household, and the claimant’s descendants, and the
claimant’s siblings or spouse who have moved on an indefinite basis from the
homestead to a residential care or nursing home and who claim no rebate or
credit for such year under this chapter;
(2) the municipal property tax of a claimant who is a joint tenant or
tenant by the entirety with, and legally separated from, a spouse who is not a
member of the household is the tax on the housesite for which the claimant is
responsible pursuant to a court-approved settlement agreement;
(3) the municipal property tax of a claimant who is a joint tenant with a
former spouse and who has possession of the homestead pursuant to the joint
owners’ final divorce decree is the municipal property tax for which the
claimant is responsible under the joint owners’ final divorce decree or any
modifying orders; and
(4) if the homestead is a portion of a duplex and all owners of the duplex
occupy some portion of the building as their principal residence, the municipal
property tax of the claimant shall be that percentage of the total municipal
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 32 of 50
property tax equal to the ratio of the claimant’s principal residence value to the
total duplex building value.
(d) Whenever a housesite is an integral part of a larger unit such as a farm
or a multi-purpose multipurpose or multi-dwelling multidwelling building,
municipal property taxes paid shall be that percentage of the total municipal
property tax as the value of the housesite is to the total value. Upon a
claimant’s request, the listers shall certify to the claimant the value of his or
her the claimant’s homestead and housesite.
* * *
Sec. 22. 32 V.S.A. § 6063 is amended to read:
§ 6063. CLAIM AS PERSONAL; CREDIT AMOUNT AT TIME OF
TRANSFER
(a) The right to file a claim under this chapter is personal to the claimant
and shall not survive his or her the claimant’s death, but the right may be
exercised on behalf of a claimant by his or her the claimant’s legal guardian or
attorney-in-fact. When a claimant dies after having filed a timely claim, the
municipal property tax credit amount shall be credited to the homestead
property tax liability of the claimant’s estate as provided in section 6066a of
this title.
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 33 of 50
(b) In case of sale or transfer of a residence, any municipal property tax
credit amounts related to that residence shall be allocated to the seller at
closing unless the parties otherwise agree.
Sec. 23. 32 V.S.A. § 6064 is amended to read:
§ 6064. CLAIM APPLIED AGAINST OUTSTANDING LIABILITIES
The amount of any municipal property tax credit resulting under this
chapter may be applied by the Commissioner, beginning July 1 of the calendar
year in which the claim is filed, against any State tax liability outstanding
against the claimant.
Sec. 24. 32 V.S.A. § 6065 is amended to read:
§ 6065. FORMS; TABLES; NOTICES
(a) A homestead owner shall declare ownership of a homestead for
purposes of the municipal property tax credit. The Commissioner shall adopt
rules governing the eligibility requirements for declaring a homestead. In
administering this chapter, the Commissioner shall provide suitable claim
forms with tables of allowable claims, instructions, and worksheets for
claiming a homestead municipal property tax credit.
(b) Prior to June 1, the Commissioner shall also prepare and supply to each
town in the State notices describing the homestead municipal property tax
credit for inclusion in property tax bills. The notice shall be in simple, plain
language and shall explain how to file for a property tax credit, where to find
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 34 of 50
assistance filing for a credit, and any other related information as determined
by the Commissioner. The notice shall direct taxpayers to a resource where
they can find versions of the notice translated into the five most common non-
English languages in the State. A town shall include such notice in each tax
bill and notice of delinquent taxes that it mails to taxpayers who own in that
town a residential property, without regard for whether the property was
declared a homestead pursuant to subdivision 5401(7) of this title.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, towns
that use envelopes or mailers not able to accommodate notices describing the
homestead municipal tax credit may distribute such notices in an alternative
manner.
Sec. 25. 32 V.S.A. § 6066 is amended to read:
§ 6066. COMPUTATION OF MUNICIPAL PROPERTY TAX CREDIT
AND RENTER CREDIT
(a) An eligible A claimant whose household income does not exceed
$47,000.00 and who owned the homestead on April 1 of the year in which the
claim is filed shall be entitled to a credit for the prior year’s homestead
municipal property tax liability amount determined as follows: in an amount
for the upcoming fiscal year that is equal to the amount by which the municipal
property taxes for the municipal fiscal year that began in the taxable year upon
the claimant’s housesite exceeds a percentage of the claimant’s household
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 35 of 50
income for the taxable year, provided that in no event shall the credit under this
subsection exceed the amount of the reduced property tax. The amount of the
credit under this subsection shall be determined as follows:
(1)(A) For a claimant with household income of $130,000.00 or more:
(i) the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the equalized
value of the housesite in the taxable year;
(ii) minus (if less) the sum of:
(I) the income percentage of household income for the taxable
year; plus
(II) the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the equalized
value of the housesite in the taxable year in excess of $400,000.00.
(B) For a claimant with household income of less than $90,000.00 but
more than $60,000.00, the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the
equalized value of the housesite in the taxable year, minus (if less) the sum of:
(i) the income percentage of household income for the taxable
year; plus
(ii) the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the equalized
value of the housesite in the taxable year in excess of $1,000,000.00.
(C) For a claimant whose household income does not exceed
$60,000.00, the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the equalized value
of the housesite in the taxable year, minus the lesser of:
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 36 of 50
(i) the sum of the income percentage of household income for the
taxable year plus the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the equalized
value of the housesite in the taxable year in excess of $1,000,000.00; or
(ii) the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the equalized
value of the housesite in the taxable year reduced by $15,000.00.
(2) “Income percentage” in this section means two percent, multiplied by
the education income tax spending adjustment under subdivision 5401(13)(B)
of this title for the property tax year that begins in the claim year for the
municipality in which the homestead residence is located.
(3) A claimant whose household income does not exceed $47,000.00
shall also be entitled to an additional credit amount from the claimant’s
municipal taxes for the upcoming fiscal year that is equal to the amount by
which the municipal property taxes for the municipal fiscal year that began in
the taxable year upon the claimant’s housesite exceeds a percentage of the
claimant’s household income for the taxable year as follows:
If household income (rounded then the taxpayer is entitled to
to the nearest dollar) is: credit for the reduced property tax in
excess of this percent of that income
$0.00 — 9,999.00 1.50
$10,000.00 — 47,000.00 3.00
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 37 of 50
(4) A claimant whose household income does not exceed $60,000.00
shall also be entitled to an additional credit amount from the claimant’s
statewide education tax for the upcoming fiscal year that is equal to the amount
by which the education property tax for the municipal fiscal year that began in
the taxable year upon the claimant’s housesite, reduced by the credit amount
determined under subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, exceeds a
percentage of the claimant’s household income for the taxable year as follows:
If household income (rounded then the taxpayer is entitled to
to the nearest dollar) is: credit for the reduced property tax in
excess of this percent of that income
$0.00 — 9,999.00 0.50
$10,000 — 24,999.00 1.50
$25,000.00 — 46,999.00 2.00
$47,000.00 — 60,000.00 lesser of 2.50
or town rate
(5) In no event shall the credit provided for in subdivision (3) or (4) of
this subsection exceed the amount of the reduced property tax. The credits
under subdivision (4) of this subsection shall be calculated considering only
the tax due on the first $1,000,000.00 in equalized housesite value.
* * *
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 38 of 50
(e) Property taxes paid by a cooperative, not including a mobile home park
cooperative, allocable to property used as a homestead shall be attributable to
the co-op member for the purpose of computing the credit of municipal
property tax liability of the co-op member under this section. Property owned
by a cooperative declared as a homestead may only include the homestead and
a pro rata share of any common land owned or leased by the cooperative, not
to exceed the two-acre housesite limitation. The share of the cooperative’s
assessed value attributable to the housesite shall be determined by the
cooperative and specified annually in a notice to the co-op member. Property
taxes paid by a mobile home park cooperative, allocable to property used as a
housesite, shall be attributed to the owner of the housesite for the purpose of
computing the credit of municipal property tax liability of the housesite owner
under this section. Property owned by the mobile home park cooperative and
declared as a housesite may only include common property of the cooperative
contiguous with at least one mobile home lot in the park, not to exceed the
two-acre housesite limitation. The share attributable to any mobile home lot
shall be determined by the cooperative and specified in the cooperative
agreement.
(f) [Repealed.]
(g) Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, if the land surrounding a
homestead is owned by a nonprofit corporation or community land trust with
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 39 of 50
tax exempt status under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), the homeowner may include an
allocated amount as property tax paid on the land with the amount of property
taxes paid by the homeowner on the home for the purposes of computation of
the credit under this section. The allocated amount shall be determined by the
nonprofit corporation or community land trust on a proportional basis. The
nonprofit corporation or community land trust shall provide to that
homeowner, by January 31, a certificate specifying the allocated amount. The
certificate shall indicate the proportion of total property tax on the parcel that
was assessed for municipal property tax and for statewide property tax.
(h) A homestead owner shall be entitled to an additional property tax credit
amount equal to one percent of the amount of income tax refund that the
claimant elects to allocate to payment of homestead property tax under section
6068 of this title. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 26. 32 V.S.A. § 6066a is amended to read:
§ 6066a. DETERMINATION OF MUNICIPAL PROPERTY TAX CREDIT
(a) Annually, the Commissioner shall determine the municipal property tax
credit amount under section 6066 of this title, related to a homestead owned by
the claimant, based on the prior taxable year’s income and crediting municipal
property taxes paid in the prior year. The Commissioner shall notify the
municipality in which the housesite is located of the amount of the property tax
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 40 of 50
credit for the claimant for homestead municipal property tax liabilities on a
monthly basis. The tax credit of a claimant who was assessed property tax by
a town that revised the dates of its fiscal year, however, is the excess of the
municipal property tax that was assessed in the last 12 months of the revised
fiscal year, over the adjusted property tax of the claimant for the revised fiscal
year, as determined under section 6066 of this title, related to a homestead
owned by the claimant.
(b) The Commissioner shall include in the total property tax credit amount
determined under subsection (a) of this section, for credit to the taxpayer for
homestead property tax liabilities, any income tax overpayment remaining
after allocation under section 3112 of this title and setoff under section 5934 of
this title, which the taxpayer has directed to be used for payment of property
taxes. [Repealed.]
(c) The Commissioner shall notify the municipality of any claim and
refund amounts unresolved by November 1 at the time of final resolution,
including adjudication, if any; provided, however, that towns will not be
notified of any additional credit amounts after November 1 of the claim year,
and such amounts shall be paid to the claimant by the Commissioner.
(d) [Repealed.]
(e) At the time of notice to the municipality, the Commissioner shall notify
the taxpayer of the municipal property tax credit amount determined under
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 41 of 50
subdivision subsection 6066(a)(1) of this title, the amount determined under
subdivision 6066(a)(3) of this title, any additional credit amounts due the
homestead owner under section 6066 of this title, the amount of income tax
refund, if any, allocated to payment of homestead property tax liabilities, and
any late-claim reduction amount.
(f)(1) For taxpayers and amounts stated in the notice to towns on or before
July 1, municipalities shall create and send to taxpayers a homestead property
tax bill, instead of the bill required under subdivision 5402(b)(1) of this title,
providing the total amount allocated to payment of homestead education
property tax liabilities and notice of the balance due. Municipalities shall
apply the amount allocated under this chapter to current year property taxes in
equal amounts to each of the taxpayers’ property tax installments that include
education taxes. Notwithstanding section 4772 of this title, if a town issues a
corrected bill as a result of the notice sent by the Commissioner under
subsection (a) of this section, issuance of the corrected new bill does not
extend the time for payment of the original bill nor relieve the taxpayer of any
interest or penalties associated with the original bill. If the corrected bill is less
than the original bill, and there are also no unpaid current year taxes, interest,
or penalties, and no past year delinquent taxes or penalties and interest charges,
any overpayment shall be reflected on the corrected tax bill and refunded to the
taxpayer.
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 42 of 50
(2) For property tax credit amounts for which municipalities receive
notice after November 1, municipalities shall issue a new homestead property
tax bill with notice to the taxpayer of the total amount allocated to payment of
homestead property tax liabilities and notice of the balance due.
(3) The property tax credit amount determined for the taxpayer shall be
allocated first to current year property tax on the homestead parcel, next to
current-year homestead parcel penalties and interest, next to any prior year
homestead parcel penalties and interest, and last to any prior year property tax
on the homestead parcel. No credit shall be allocated to a property tax liability
for any year after the year for which the claim or refund allocation was filed.
No municipal tax-reduction incentive for early payment of taxes shall apply to
any amount allocated to the property tax bill under this chapter.
(4) If the property tax credit amount as described in subsection (e) of
this section exceeds the property tax, penalties, and interest due for the current
and all prior years, the municipality shall refund the excess to the taxpayer,
without interest, within 20 days of the first date upon which taxes become due
and payable or 20 days after notification of the credit amount by the
Commissioner of Taxes, whichever is later. [Repealed.]
(g) The Commissioner of Taxes shall pay monthly to each municipality the
amount of municipal property tax credit of which the municipality was last
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 43 of 50
notified related to municipal property tax on homesteads within that
municipality, as determined by the Commissioner of Taxes.
Sec. 27. 32 V.S.A. § 6067 is amended to read:
§ 6067. CREDIT LIMITATIONS
Only one individual per household per taxable year shall be entitled to a
municipal property tax credit under this chapter. An individual who received a
homestead exemption or credit with respect to property taxes assessed by
another state for the taxable year shall not be entitled to receive a credit under
this chapter. No taxpayer shall receive a renter credit under subsection 6066(b)
of this title in excess of $2,500.00. No taxpayer shall receive a municipal
property tax credit under subdivision subsection 6066(a)(3) of this title greater
than $2,400.00 or cumulative credit under subdivisions 6066(a)(1)-(2) and (4)
of this title greater than $5,600.00.
Sec. 28. 32 V.S.A. § 6068 is amended to read:
§ 6068. APPLICATION AND TIME FOR FILING
(a) A property tax credit claim or request for allocation of an income tax
refund to homestead property tax payment shall be filed with the
Commissioner on or before the due date for filing the Vermont income tax
return, without extension, and shall describe the school district in which the
homestead property is located and shall particularly describe the homestead
property for which the credit or allocation is sought, including the school
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 44 of 50
parcel account number prescribed in subsection 5404(b) of this title. A renter
credit claim shall be filed with the Commissioner on or before the due date for
filing the Vermont income tax return, without extension.
(b) If the claimant files a claim after October 15 but on or before March 15
of the following calendar year, the municipal property tax credit under this
chapter:
* * *
(c) No request for allocation of an income tax refund or for a renter credit
claim may be made after October 15. No municipal property tax credit claim
may be made after March 15 of the calendar year following the due date under
subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 29. 32 V.S.A. § 6070 is amended to read:
§ 6070. DISALLOWED CLAIMS
A claim shall be disallowed if the claimant received title to his or her the
claimant’s homestead primarily for the purpose of receiving benefits under this
chapter.
* * * Revenue Allocation and Education Payments * * *
Sec. 30. 16 V.S.A. § 4001 is amended to read:
§ 4001. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 45 of 50
(1) “Average daily membership” of a school district or, if needed in
order to calculate the appropriate homestead education income tax rate, of the
municipality as defined in 32 V.S.A. § 5401(9), in any year means:
* * *
(2) “Equalized grand list” has the same meaning that equalized
education property tax grand list has in 32 V.S.A. chapter 135.
* * *
Sec. 31. 16 V.S.A. § 4025 is amended to read:
§ 4025. EDUCATION FUND
(a) The Education Fund is established to comprise the following:
(1) all revenue paid to the State from the statewide education tax on
nonhomestead and homestead property under 32 V.S.A. chapter 135;
* * *
(10) wind-powered electric generating facilities tax deposited pursuant
to 32 V.S.A. § 5402c; and
(11) revenues from the short-term rental surcharge under 32 V.S.A.
§ 9301; and
(12) revenues from the education income tax imposed by 32 V.S.A.
chapter 151, subchapter 14.
(b) Monies in the Education Fund shall be used for the following:
* * *
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 46 of 50
(3) To make payments required under 32 V.S.A. § 6066(a)(1) 5964 and
only that portion attributable to education taxes, as determined by the
Commissioner of Taxes, of payments required under 32 V.S.A. § 6066(a)(3).
The State Treasurer shall withdraw funds from the Education Fund upon
warrants issued by the Commissioner of Finance and Management based on
information supplied by the Commissioner of Taxes. The Commissioner of
Finance and Management may draw warrants for disbursements from the Fund
in anticipation of receipts. All balances in the Fund at the end of any fiscal
year shall be carried forward and remain a part of the Fund. Interest accruing
from the Fund shall remain in the Fund.
* * *
Sec. 32. 32 V.S.A. § 435(b) is amended to read:
(b) The General Fund shall be composed of revenues from the following
sources:
* * *
(5) individual income taxes levied pursuant to chapter 151 of this title,
except for the education income tax surcharge imposed by section 5962 of this
title;
* * *
* * * FY26 Income Sensitivity Adjustments * * *
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 47 of 50
Sec. 33. 32 V.S.A. § 6066 is amended to read:
§ 6066. COMPUTATION OF PROPERTY TAX CREDIT AND RENTER
CREDIT
(a) An eligible claimant who owned the homestead on April 1 of the year in
which the claim is filed shall be entitled to a credit for the prior year’s
homestead property tax liability amount determined as follows:
(1)(A) For a claimant with household income of $90,000.00
$130,000.00 or more:
(i) the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the equalized
value of the housesite in the taxable year;
(ii) minus (if less) the sum of:
(I) the income percentage of household income for the taxable
year; plus
(II) the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the
equalized value of the housesite in the taxable year in excess of $225,000.00
$400,000.00.
(B) For a claimant with household income of less than $90,000.00
but more than $47,000.00 $60,000.00, the statewide education tax rate,
multiplied by the equalized value of the housesite in the taxable year, minus (if
less) the sum of:
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 48 of 50
(i) the income percentage of household income for the taxable
year; plus
(ii) the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the equalized
value of the housesite in the taxable year in excess of $400,000.00
$1,000,000.00.
(C) For a claimant whose household income does not exceed
$47,000.00 $60,000.00, the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the
equalized value of the housesite in the taxable year, minus the lesser of:
(i) the sum of the income percentage of household income for the
taxable year plus the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the equalized
value of the housesite in the taxable year in excess of $400,000.00
$1,000,000.00; or
(ii) the statewide education tax rate, multiplied by the equalized
value of the housesite in the taxable year reduced by $15,000.00.
* * *
(3) A claimant whose household income does not exceed $47,000.00
shall also be entitled to an additional credit amount from the claimant’s
municipal taxes for the upcoming fiscal year that is equal to the amount by
which the municipal property taxes for the municipal fiscal year that began in
the taxable year upon the claimant’s housesite exceeds a percentage of the
claimant’s household income for the taxable year as follows:
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 49 of 50
If household income (rounded then the taxpayer is entitled to
to the nearest dollar) is: credit for the reduced property tax in
excess of this percent of that income
$0.00 — 9,999.00 1.50
$10,000.00 — 47,000.00 3.00
(4) A claimant whose household income does not exceed $47,000.00
$60,000.00 shall also be entitled to an additional credit amount from the
claimant’s statewide education tax for the upcoming fiscal year that is equal to
the amount by which the education property tax for the municipal fiscal year
that began in the taxable year upon the claimant’s housesite, reduced by the
credit amount determined under subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection,
exceeds a percentage of the claimant’s household income for the taxable year
as follows:
If household income (rounded then the taxpayer is entitled to
to the nearest dollar) is: credit for the reduced property tax in
excess of this percent of that income
$0.00 — 9,999.00 0.50
$10,000 — 24,999.00 1.50
$25,000.00 — 47,000 46,999.00 2.00
$47,000 — 60,000.00 lesser of 2.50
or town rate
VT LEG #380222 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.177
2025 Page 50 of 50
(5) In no event shall the credit provided for in subdivision (3) or (4) of
this subsection exceed the amount of the reduced property tax. The credits
under subdivision (4) of this subsection shall be calculated considering only
the tax due on the first $400,000.00 $1,000,000.00 in equalized housesite
value.
* * *
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 34. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 33 (income sensitivity adjustments) shall take effect on July 1,
2025.
(b) All remaining sections shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380222 v.5